Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 8. Newborn Screening

§ 35-4-801.
Screening required for detection of genetic and metabolic diseases and hearing defects in newborn children; conduct of screening; exceptions; fees.

Every child born in the state of Wyoming shall be given medical examinations for detection of remedial inborn errors of metabolism, major hearing defects and any other metabolic or genetic diseases as determined by the committee established by subsection (b) of this section. The screening shall be conducted in accordance with accepted medical practices and in the manner prescribed in rule by the state department of health.

The specific tests to be done shall be determined by a committee consisting of the following:

The state health officer in the department of health;

The president of the Wyoming state medical society;

A member designated by the Wyoming state pediatric society;

A member who is a board-certified obstetrician/gynecologist.

Informed consent of parents shall be obtained and if any parent or guardian of a child objects to a mandatory examination the child is exempt from subsection (a) of this section. The department of health shall provide educational information to healthcare providers for distribution to the parent containing information on the testing procedures, the diseases being screened and the consequences of screening or nonscreening.

Following consultation with the committee described in subsection (b) of this section, the department of health may provide by rule and regulation for the assessment of a fee, payable to the department, to cover the reasonable cost of the screenings required by this section. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into a separate account and are continuously appropriated to the department of health for purposes of the newborn screening program required by this section.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 36, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1999, ch. 19, § 1; 2007, ch. 198, § 1; 2009, ch. 81, § 1; 2016 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (d).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a) deleted “and for detection of” preceding “major hearing” and added “and any other metabolic or genetic diseases pursuant to subsection (b) of this section” in the first sentence, added the second sentence in (c), and deleted “metabolic and hearing” preceding “screenings required” in (d).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (a), deleted “within three (3) to five (5) days for full term children and five (5) to eight (8) days for premature children following birth unless a different time period is medically indicated,” following “state of Wyoming”, substituted “as determined by the committee established by” for “pursuant to” and inserted “in rule” following “manner prescribed”; and rewrote former (b)(iv) which read: “A member designated by the Wyoming obstetric/gynecological society.”

§ 35-4-802.
Rules and regulations.

The state department of health shall make all rules and regulations necessary for:

Dissemination of the provisions of W.S.

35-4-801

to all hospitals and physicians within the state; and

Implementation of W.S.

35-4-801

, as amended.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 36, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1999, ch. 19, § 1; 2009, ch. 81, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(ii) deleted “not later than July 1, 1999” following “amended.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.